Hawaii statutes.
[§523A-63] Disposition of property
received. Property received under this part shall be deposited or sold by
the director as though received under part I of this chapter. Property
received under this part shall not be subject to claim within two years following
the date upon which it is paid to or received by the State. Thereafter,
persons claiming an interest in the unclaimed property delivered to the State
pursuant to this part shall make their claims in the manner provided in part I
of this chapter. [L 1988, c 93, pt of §2]

Note

The amendment made by L 2008, c 55, §2 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next